Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1744
Fees.

A credit union may charge an entrance fee as determined by its board of directors. A credit union may also charge periodic membership fees as determined by its board of directors.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 44.